Utah statutes.
53A-2-115.   Additional levies in transferred territory -- Transferee board option to abolish or continue.

If two or more districts undergo restructuring that results in a district receiving territory that increases the population of the district by at least 25%, and if the transferred territory was, at the time of transfer, subject to an additional levy under Section 53A-16-110, 53A-17a-133, 53A-17a-134, or 53A-17a-145, the board of education of the transferee district may abolish the levy or apply the levy in whole or in part to the entire restructured district.  Any such levy made applicable to the entire district may continue in force for no more than five years, unless approved by the electors of the restructured district in the manner set forth in Section 53A-16-110.

